Missouri, session 2026, HB2772.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 173, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 173.2563, to read as follows:
173.2563. 1. There is hereby established within the department of higher
education and workforce development the "Youth Workforce Development Program".
Such program shall provide participants opportunities to enter the workforce and other
necessary skills to be successful in the workplace. The department shall work in
conjunction with the department of social services and the department of elementary
and secondary education to develop the program established under this section.
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "At-risk youth", a youth who experiences social, economic, familial, or
behavioral problems that make such youth vulnerable to delinquency or the use of
illegal drugs. Risk factors that increase vulnerability include, but are not limited to,
having three or more school suspensions within the same school year; having substance-
abusing parents or friends; being the victim of physical, sexual, or psychological abuse;
dropping out of school; becoming pregnant; being economically disadvantaged;
experiencing mental health problems; attempting suicide; or being a runaway or
homeless;
(2) "Department", the department of higher education and workforce
development;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2772 2
(3) "Program", the youth workforce development program;
(4) "Youth", an individual who is at least twelve years of age but under twenty-
one years of age.
3. (1) To be eligible to participate in the program, participants shall be:
(a) Youth who are currently involved in the juvenile justice system, youth who
were involved in the juvenile justice system, or at-risk youth;
(b) Residents of a county with more than one million inhabitants or a city not
within a county; and
(c) Referred to the program under subdivision (1) of subsection 7 of this section.
(2) Participation in the program shall be limited in the first year to five hundred
participants.
4. The goals of the program shall include, but are not limited to:
(1) Providing job training and creating certification programs in high-demand
industries for participants. Job training may also include restorative justice practices
and conflict resolution workshops for participants who are currently involved in the
juvenile justice system or who were involved in the juvenile justice system;
(2) Establishing internships and apprenticeships with local businesses for
participants;
(3) Providing training for life skills and soft skills for participants. Such training
shall include programs designed to provide the participant with the ability to
communicate effectively, work in a team setting, and make informed decisions
regarding money and financial services;
(4) Educating youth regarding healthy relationships, marriage, and future
family roles; and
(5) Fostering supportive family environments and responsible community
engagement.
5. The department shall provide assistance to each juvenile detention facility
located in a county with more than one million inhabitants or a city not within a county
for the creation of a center within the facility that would provide the following to a
participant being held in the facility:
(1) Vocational training;
(2) High school diploma or general education development programs; and
(3) Resume-building workshops.
6. The department shall:
(1) Collaborate with high schools to integrate career and technical education
programs;
(2) Encourage:

HB 2772 3
(a) Local businesses to partner with community organizations to create
workforce opportunities for participants in the program. Such businesses and
organizations shall be located in a county with more than one million inhabitants or a
city not within a county. The department shall work with such businesses to help the
businesses seek potential tax credits if the businesses hire participants from the
program; and
(b) Agencies and community leaders, nonprofit organizations, and faith-based
organizations located in a county with more than one million inhabitants or a city not
within a county to provide basic needs to participants in the program; and
(3) Provide community leaders, nonprofit organizations, and faith-based
organizations located in a county with more than one million inhabitants or a city not
within a county with information regarding neighborhood mentorship grants to help
guide participants in the program.
7. (1) The following entities may refer a youth to the program:
(a) Juvenile courts as part of probation or a diversion program;
(b) The department of social services; or
(c) A school, if an individual within that school identifies a youth as being an at-
risk youth who could benefit from the program.
(2) The department shall develop a metric to determine criteria for participation
in the program.
8. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Youth Workforce
Development Program Fund", which shall consist of gifts, bequests, grants, transfers,
and moneys appropriated by the general assembly. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer
may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon
appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely for the program established
under this section and for transportation; child care; mental health services to support
program participants; participant participation in general youth engagement activities,
sports field trips, and mentorship programs; and stipends for internships or sponsored
job opportunities.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.

HB 2772 4
9. Before October 1, 2027, and before each October first thereafter, the
department, in conjunction with the department of social services and the department of
elementary and secondary education, shall create a report and submit the report to the
governor, speaker of the house of representatives, and president pro tempore of the
senate. The report shall contain the following information:
(1) The number of participants in the program;
(2) The employment rate of the participants after completion of the program;
(3) The recidivism rate of participants in the program;
(4) The efficacy of the program with projected growth numbers; and
100 (5) Any recommended changes to the program.
101 10. In determining the efficacy of the program and any recommended changes to
102 the program, the department may consult with third parties including, but not limited
103 to, universities and research organizations.
104 11. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
105 (1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall sunset
106 six years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
107 general assembly; and
108 (2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
109 immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
110 section is sunset.
111 12. The department, in conjunction with the department of social services and
112 the department of elementary and secondary education, shall promulgate all necessary
113 rules and regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a
114 rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
115 delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
116 all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
117 chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
118 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
119 a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
120 and any rule proposed or adopted after the effective date of this section shall be invalid
121 and void.
✔